Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2931.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1401, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1401. Civil rights division; definition A. There is created The civil rights division within the department of law which shall include the Arizona civil rights advisory board is established. The board shall be composed of seven members who shall be appointed by the governor. Not more than four of the members shall at any one time be of the same political party. Each member shall serve for a term of three years. Of the members of the board first appointed, two shall be appointed for terms ending January 31, 1966, two for terms ending January 31, 1967, and three for terms ending January 31, 1968. Thereafter, the terms shall expire on the third Monday in January of the appropriate year. B. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be subject to the same limitation with respect to party affiliations as the original appointment. C. The board shall elect from its membership a chairman and vice chairman. The vice chairman shall act as chairman in the absence or disability of the chairman, or in the event of a vacancy in that office. D. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum, except that if the chairman appoints a subcommittee of the board a majority of the members of the subcommittee shall constitute a quorum. The concurrence of four of the members when in session as a board shall be the act of the board. E. Each member shall receive compensation as determined pursuant to section 38-611 for each day in which he participates in meetings, but not to exceed one thousand dollars in any fiscal year. F. B. For the purposes of this chapter, "board" means the Arizona civil rights advisory board and "division" means the civil rights division within the department of law.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 9, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-1401.01, to read: START_STATUTE41-1401.01. Arizona civil rights advisory board; terms; vacancies; organization; quorum; compensation; definition A. The Arizona civil rights advisory board is established in the division.  The board shall be composed of seven members who shall be appointed by the governor. Not more than four of the members shall at any one time be of the same political party. Each member shall serve for a term of three years.  The terms shall expire on the third Monday in January of the appropriate year. B. An appointment to fill a vacancy shall be subject to the same limitation with respect to party affiliations as the original appointment. C. The board shall elect from its membership a chairperson and vice chairperson. The vice chairperson shall act as chairperson in the absence or disability of the chairperson, or in the event of a vacancy in that office. D. Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum, except that if the chairperson appoints a subcommittee of the board a majority of the members of the subcommittee shall constitute a quorum. The concurrence of four of the members when in session as a board shall be the act of the board. E. Each member shall receive compensation as determined pursuant to section 38-611 for each day in which the member participates in meetings, but not to exceed $1,000 in any fiscal year. F. For the purposes of this chapter, "board" means the Arizona civil rights advisory board.END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Repeal Section 41-3026.11, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. Sec. 4. Title 41, chapter 27, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3030.27, to read: START_STATUTE41-3030.27. Arizona civil rights advisory board; termination July 1, 2030 A. The Arizona civil rights advisory board terminates on July 1, 2030. B. Section 41-1401.01 and this section are repealed on January 1, 2031.END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Purpose Pursuant to section 41-2955, subsection B, Arizona Revised Statutes, the legislature continues the Arizona civil rights advisory board to conduct hearings, obtain information and report on civil rights issues that impact Arizonans as prescribed by state law and to perform those other functions as prescribed by law. Sec. 6. Retroactivity Sections 3 and 4 of this act apply retroactively to from and after July 1, 2026.